Utah statutes.
63M-1-410.   Revocation of designations.

(1)  The office may revoke the designation of an enterprise zone, if no businesses utilize the tax incentives during any calendar year.

(2)  Prior to that action, the office shall conduct a public hearing to determine reasons for inactivity and explore possible alternative actions.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

